Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB854.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 306. Changing stations in public buildings or facilities.(a) Installation and maintenance.--An individual, agency, corporation, partnership, company, organization, association or other business entity that owns or manages a public building or facility, a State-owned building or a health care facility shall install and maintain at least one adult changing station for persons with disabilities or special health care issues or the 1234567891011121314151617181920 elderly. Each changing station shall be accessible to both men and women when the public building or facility is open to the public and any of the following conditions are met:(1) The public building or facility, State-owned building or health care facility is constructed on or after the date which is two years after the effective date of this subsection.(2) When an alteration or addition is made on or after the date which is four years after the effective date of this subsection to a public building or facility, State-owned building or health care facility that existed before the effective date of this subsection and:(i) the alteration or addition requires a permit; and(ii) the estimated cost of the alteration or addition is $20,000 or more.(b) Signage.--A public building or facility, State-owned building or health care facility shall ensure that:(1) the entrance to each adult changing station has conspicuous signage indicating the location of the adult changing station; and(2) if the public building or facility, State-owned building or health care facility has a central directory, the central directory indicates the location of the adult changing station.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Adult changing station." A private, enclosed family or assisted-use toilet facility containing an adult changing table 20250SB0854PN0955 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that is for use by older children, the elderly and adults with disabilities or special health care needs."Adult changing table." A powered, height-adjustable table that:(1) Has safety rails on each side of the table and a safety belt.(2) Is capable of being lowered to a height of no less than 19 inches and raised to a height of no less than 38 inches.(3) Is at least 25 inches wide and at least 72 inches long.(4) Supports at least 400 pounds."Health care facility." A general or special hospital, including psychiatric hospitals, rehabilitation hospitals and long-term care nursing facilities. The term includes both for-profit and nonprofit entities and includes those operated by an agency or State or local government. The term shall also include a hospice. The term does not include an office used primarily for the private or group practice by health care practitioners where no reviewable clinically related health service is offered."Public building or facility." An establishment with the capacity to serve 1,500 or more persons per day, including an auditorium, convention center, permanent amusement park, movie theater, theater, concert hall, sports arena, stadium, shopping center or store of at least 40,000 square feet, museum library, park, zoo, airport, train station and bus station."State-owned building." The Capitol Building, a building owned or managed by the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts, rest stops located on interstate highways and the 20250SB0854PN0955 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pennsylvania Turnpike and a public building or facility located on a State-owned or State-related college or university.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0854PN0955 - 4 - 123